Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.174

Facial recognition matching system.

"Facial recognition matching system" means a system that compares the biometric template derived from an image of an applicant or holder of a driver's license, permit, or identicard with the biometric templates derived from the images in the department's negative file.

[ 2012 c 80 s 3.]